Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202561-202
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment; employment of personnel.

The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment may employ such personnel, including legal and technical advisors, as necessary to carry out the duties required of the department, including the duties required of the Chief Water Officer.

Laws 1957, c. 365, § 20, p. 1241;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 46-702;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 328.